src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_verbs.lexc
LEXICON VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary
0:%>%> VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VIIPL, Class: VIIPL_d                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VIIPL, Class: VIIPL_d                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VIIPL, Class: VIIPL_d, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj            !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings
+VIIPL+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0PlObvSubj:sininiigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0PlSubj:sinoogwen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+%0PlObvSubj:sininigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+%0PlSubj:sinoogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0PlObvSubj:sininig EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0PlSubj:sinog EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0PlSubj:sinok EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0PlObvSubj:sininigiban EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0PlSubj:sinoogiban EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0PlObvSubj:inigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0PlSubj:ogwen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+%0PlObvSubj:inigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+%0PlSubj:ogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0PlObvSubj:inig EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0PlObvSubj:ininig EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0PlSubj:k EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0PlSubj:kin EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlObvSubj:inigiban EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlObvSubj:ininigiban EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj:kiban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VIIPL, Class: VIIPL_d, Prefix: NONE, Order: Ind            !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlObvSubj:sininiwidogen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlObvSubj:sininiwidogenan EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlSubj:sinodogen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlSubj:sinodogenan EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+%0PlObvSubj:sininigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+%0PlObvSubj:sininigobaniin EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+%0PlSubj:sinoogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+%0PlSubj:sinoogobaniin EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlObvSubj:sininiwan EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlSubj:sinoon EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObvSubj:sininiibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObvSubj:sininiibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlSubj:sinoobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlSubj:sinoobaniin EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlObvSubj:iniwidogen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlObvSubj:iniwidogenan EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlSubj:odogen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlSubj:odogenan EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+%0PlObvSubj:inigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+%0PlObvSubj:inigobaniin EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+%0PlSubj:ogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+%0PlSubj:ogobaniin EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlObvSubj:iniwan EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlSubj:oon EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObvSubj:iniibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObvSubj:iniibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj:oobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VIIPL+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj:oobaniin EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VIIPL, Class: VIIPL_VV                                     !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary
0:%>%> VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VIIPL, Class: VIIPL_VV                                     !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VIIPL, Class: VIIPL_VV                                     !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VIIPL, Class: VIIPL_VV, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj           !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VIIPL_Stems
ayaakoonagadoon:ayaakoonagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
ayaakwaabiigadoon:ayaakwaabiigad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
ayaakwaakwadoon:ayaakwaakwad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
ayaanigokominagadoon:ayaanigokominagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
ayaanigokwaawan:ayaanigokwaa VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
ayaanigokwegadoon:ayaanigokwegad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
ayagaasaawan:ayagaasaa VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
ayakwaabiigadoon:ayakwaabiigad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
baataniinadoon:baataniinad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
baatayiinadoon:baatayiinad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
babaabagaawan:babaabagaa VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
babiikominagadoon:babiikominagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
babiisaakwadoon:babiisaakwad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
babiiwaabikadoon:babiiwaabikad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
babiiwaawan:babiiwaa VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
babiiwegadoon:babiiwegad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
babiiwisagadoon:babiiwisagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
babimagoodewan:babimagoode VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
bangiiwagadoon:bangiiwagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
bebakanadoon:bebakanad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
dadaakwaakwadoon:dadaakwaakwad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
dadaakwaawan:dadaakwaa VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
dasookidewan:dasookide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
dasoonagadoon:dasoonagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
gagaanominagadoon:gagaanominagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
gagaanoondewan:gagaanoonde VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
gagaanwaabiigadoon:gagaanwaabiigad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
gagaanwaakwadoon:gagaanwaakwad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
gagaapagaawan:gagaapagaa VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
gagaapagiigadoon:gagapagiigad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
ingodwaasoopidewan:ingodwaasoopide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
ingodwaaswewaanagadoon:ingodwaaswewaanagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
izhiinadoon:izhiinad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
maamawibidewan:maamawibide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
mamaachaakwadoon:mamaachaakwad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
mamaachaawan:mamaachaa VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
mamaangaabaminaagwadoon:mamaangaabaminaagwad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
mamaangadeyaawan:mamaangadeyaa VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
mamichaabikadoon:mamichaabikad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
mamichiigadoon:mamichiigad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
mamiskwaawan:mamiskwaa VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
midaasoopidewan:midaasoopide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
midaaswewaanagadoon:midaaswewaanagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
naanaabiganesewan:naanaabiganese VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
naaniisiiwegagoodewan:naaniisiiwegagoode VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
naanoopidewan:naanoopide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
ngodwaaswewaanagadoon:ngodwaaswewaanagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
niibidebidewan:niibidebide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
niibidegoodewan:niibidegoode VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
niibidepidewan:niibidepide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
niishtanawewan:niishtanawe VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
niiwewaanagadoon:niiwewaanagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
niizhoobidewan:niizhoobide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
niizhookidewan:niizhookide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
niizhooshkinewan:niizhooshkine VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
niizhoosidoon:niizhoosid VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
niizhwaaswewaanagadoon:niizhwaaswewaanagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
niizhwewaanagadoon:niizhwewaanagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
ningodwaasoopidewan:ningodwaasoopide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
nisimidanawewan:nisimidanawe VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
nisoogokewan:nisoogoke VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
nisoopidewan:nisoopide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
niswewaanagadoon:niswewaanagad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
okwakidewan:okwakide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
okwashkinewan:okwashkine VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
onzaamiinadoon:onzaamiinad VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_d_Boundary ;
wawaabishkaawan:wawaabishkaa VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
wawaawiyeyaawan:wawaawiyeyaa VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
wawizaawaawan:wawizaawaa VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
zagwakidewan:zagwakide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
zhaangasoopidewan:zhaangasoopide VIIPL_Class=VIIPL_VV_Boundary ;
